Missouri, session 2026, HB2871.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 407.652 and 407.653, to read as follows:
407.652. As used in sections 407.652 and 407.653, the following terms mean:
(1) "Authorized repair provider", an individual or business that has an oral or
written arrangement for a definite or indefinite period in which a manufacturer or
distributor transfers to a separate business organization or individual license to use a
trade name, service mark, or relative characteristic for the purposes of offering repair
services under the name of the manufacturer;
(2) "Documentation", manuals, diagrams, reporting output, schematic
diagrams, or service code descriptions provided to the authorized repair provider for
the purposes of repair or refurbishment;
(3) "Embedded software", programmable instructions provided on firmware
delivered with certain products for the purposes of product operation, including all
relevant safety, security, and defect patches and fixes made by the manufacturer for this
purpose. "Embedded software" shall include all software that satisfies this definition
regardless if called a different name including, but not limited to, assembly code, basic
internal operating system, internal operating system, machine code, microcode, or root
code;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2871 2
(4) "Fair and reasonable terms", an equitable price in light of relevant factors
including, but not limited to:
(a) The net cost to the authorized repair provider for similar parts obtained
from manufacturers less any discounts, rebates, or other incentive programs;
(b) The cost to the manufacturer for preparing and distributing the parts or
product, excluding any research and development costs incurred in designing and
implementing, upgrading, or altering the product, but including amortized capital costs
for the preparation and distribution of the parts; and
(c) The price charged by other manufacturers for similar parts or products;
(5) "Independent repair provider", an individual or business operating in the
state that is not affiliated with a manufacturer or a manufacturer's authorized dealer of
a product and that is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of a
product. A manufacturer's authorized dealer shall be considered an independent repair
provider if the dealer engages in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of a
product that is not affiliated with the manufacturer;
(6) "Manufacturer", an individual or business that, in the ordinary course of its
business, is engaged in selling or leasing new products to consumers or other end users
and is engaged in the diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of those products;
(7) "Owner", an individual or business that lawfully acquires a product
purchased or used in the state;
(8) "Product", any product regardless of the date purchased. "Product" shall
exclude motor vehicles;
(9) "Remote diagnostics", a remote data-transfer function between certain
products and a provider of repair services, including for purposes of remote diagnostics,
settings controls, or location identification;
(10) "Service parts", replacement parts, either new or used, made available by
the manufacturer to the authorized repair provider for the purposes of repair;
(11) "Trade secret", anything tangible or intangible or electronically stored or
kept that constitutes, represents, evidences, or records intellectual property including,
but not limited to:
(a) Secret or confidentially held designs, processes, procedures, formulas,
inventions, or improvements;
(b) Secret or confidentially held scientific, technical, merchandising, production,
financial, business, or management information; or
(c) Any trade secret as that term is defined under paragraph (3) of 18 U.S.C.
Section 1839.

HB 2871 3
407.653. 1. Owners of products purchased or used in this state shall have the
right to:
(1) Access the same diagnostic and repair information of products manufactured
by the manufacturer as the manufacturer makes available to independent repair
providers or authorized repair providers. Such information shall be provided in the
same manner and time as provided to authorized repair providers. Such information
shall include, but not be limited to, repair technical updates, diagnostic software, service
access passwords, updates and corrections to firmware, and related documentation; and
(2) Purchase service parts available upon fair and reasonable terms. Such
service parts shall be made available in the same manner and time as given to
authorized repair providers. Such service parts shall include updates to firmware or
parts.

Nothing in this section shall require the manufacturer to sell service parts if the service
parts are no longer available to the manufacturer or the authorized repair channel of
the manufacturer.
2. An authorized repair provider shall have the right to purchase diagnostic,
service, or repair information in a format standardized with other manufacturers
instead of a proprietary format from a manufacturer if the manufacturer sells
diagnostic, service, or repair information to independent repair providers or third-party
providers in such a standardized format or if the manufacturer offers terms and
conditions more favorable to independent repair providers or third-party providers
than the manner and the terms and conditions that are available to an authorized repair
provider. However, this subsection shall not apply if the proprietary format includes
diagnostic, service, repair, or dealership operations information or functionality not
available in a standardized format.
3. Owners and independent repair providers shall have the right to purchase
from manufacturers of products sold or used in this state all diagnostic repair tools,
incorporating the same diagnostic repair and remote diagnostic capabilities that the
manufacturer makes available to its own repair or engineering staff or any authorized
repair providers, upon fair and reasonable terms.
4. Manufacturers that provide repair information to aftermarket tools,
diagnostics, or third-party service information publications and systems have fully
satisfied their obligations under this section and thereafter are not responsible for the
content and functionality of aftermarket diagnostic tools or service information systems.
5. Manufacturers of products sold or used in the state for the purposes of
providing security-related functions shall not exclude diagnostic, service, or repair

HB 2871 4
information necessary to reset a security-related electronic function from information
provided to owners and independent repair providers. If necessary for security
purposes, manufacturers may provide information necessary to reset and unlock system
or security-related electronic modules to owners and independent repair providers
through an appropriate secure data release system.
6. Nothing in this section shall require the manufacturer to divulge a trade
secret.
7. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, this section shall not be read,
interpreted, or construed to abrogate, interfere with, contradict, or alter the terms of an
agreement executed between an authorized repair provider and a manufacturer
including, but not limited to, performing warranty or recall repair work by an
authorized repair provider on behalf of a manufacturer pursuant to the authorized
repair agreement. Except in the case of a dispute arising between a manufacturer and
its authorized repair provider related to either party's compliance with an existing
repair agreement, an authorized repair provider has all the rights and remedies
provided in this section.
8. This section shall not require manufacturers or authorized repair providers to
provide an owner or independent repair provider access to nondiagnostic and nonrepair
information provided by a manufacturer to an authorized repair provider pursuant to
the terms of an authorizing agreement.
9. (1) An independent repair provider or owner who believes that a
manufacturer has failed to provide information, including documentation, updates to
firmware, safety and security corrections, diagnostics, documentation, or a tool required
by this section, shall notify the manufacturer in writing and give the manufacturer
thirty days from the time the manufacturer receives the complaint to cure the failure. If
the manufacturer cures the complaint within thirty days, damages are limited to actual
damages in any subsequent litigation.
(2) If the manufacturer fails to respond to the notice provided in subdivision (1)
of this subsection or if an independent repair provider or owner is not satisfied with the
manufacturer's cure, the independent repair provider or owner may file a complaint in
circuit court. The complaint shall include:
(a) Written information confirming that the complainant attempted to acquire
and use, through the then available standard support function provided by the
manufacturer, all relevant diagnostics, tools, service parts, documentation, and updates
to embedded software, including communication with customer assistance via the
manufacturer's then standard process, if made available by the manufacturer; and

HB 2871 5
(b) Evidence of manufacturer notification as required in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
10. No manufacturer shall be required to provide any information or service
parts under subsection 1 of this section if the product for which the information or
service parts are sought is under a valid warranty for repair or replacement of the
product.
11. The attorney general shall enforce this section. Each violation of this section
shall be punishable by a five-hundred-dollar fine, which shall be deposited into the
school fund of the county in which the complaint arose.
12. This section shall not apply to manufacturers or distributors of a medical
device as defined in the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, or a digital electronic
product or software manufactured for use in a medical setting, including diagnostic,
monitoring, or control equipment or any product or service that the manufacturer or
distributor of a medical device offers.
13. This section shall not apply to a manufacturer, dealer, distributor, integrator,
installer, or monitoring service provider of a central station security device or alarm
system including, but not limited to, all central station alarm systems used to prevent,
detect, protect against, or respond to fire, carbon monoxide risks, falls, medical alerts,
or security incidents, or control access to residential, commercial, and governmental
property, services, or information systems.
✔